Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.8 Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly

40-8.8-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

40-8.8-2.
Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly.

The department of human services is hereby authorized to elect a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly as an optional Medicaid benefit, pursuant to § 1905(a)(26) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1396d(a)(26)], as added by § 4802(a)(1) of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

40-8.8-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly is to offer an alternative to nursing home care for frail elders. The program of all-inclusive care for the elderly is a pre-paid, capitated program of managed care service delivery for beneficiaries who meet special eligibility requirements, including being eligible for nursing home placement, and who elect to enroll. The model of care includes as core services the provision of adult day health care and multidisciplinary team case management, through which access to and allocation of all health services are coordinated.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

40-8.8-4.
Definition.

As used in this chapter, the term “Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly” shall mean a program of services coordinated for the eligible population by an organization approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services for these purposes. The program of services include at minimum the following benefit package: multidisciplinary assessment and treatment planning; primary care services including physician and nursing services; social work services; restorative therapies; personal care and supportive services; nutritional counseling; recreational therapy; transportation; meals; medical specialty services; laboratory tests; drugs and biologicals; prosthetics and durable medical equipment; acute inpatient care, ambulance and emergency care; and nursing facility care.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

40-8.8-5.
Authorization for program of all-inclusive care for the elderly.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its Title XIX state plan to initiate a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

40-8.8-6.
Eligibility.

To be eligible for benefits under the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly:

The person shall meet the eligibility criteria for both the Rhode Island medical assistance program and for the federal Medicare program; and

The person shall meet the eligibility criteria for the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly as established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the state department of human services, including, but not limited to:

Being at least fifty-five (55) years old;

Residing in the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly service area; and

Being certified as eligible for nursing home care by the state department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

40-8.8-7.
Regulations and commencement of program.

The department of human services shall submit the Medicaid state plan amendment and promulgate any rules or regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, contingent upon, and immediately following, federal approval of any program of all-inclusive care of the elderly.

Contingent upon completion of the Medicaid state plan amendment process, and the appropriation of necessary funding to implement the program, the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly shall commence on July 1, 2005.

Each hospital licensed in this state under chapter 17 of title 23 must accept as payment in full for providing professional component, technical component, or globally billed services to a person enrolled in a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly no more than one hundred percent (100%) of what Medicare would pay the hospital for providing the same services.

A hospital-owned or controlled professional practice or affiliate thereof must accept as payment in full for providing professional services to a person enrolled in a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly no more than one hundred percent (100%) of what Medicare would pay the relevant professional for providing the same services.

For purposes of subsection (d):

A “hospital-owned or controlled professional practice” means a practitioner’s (physician, dentist, or other healthcare provider) office or group of practitioners’ offices (whether organized as a nonprofit corporation, professional service corporation, partnership, organization, or association) that is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by a hospital licensed under chapter 17 of title 23, or is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by an affiliate of such a hospital; and

An “affiliate” means an entity that is controlled by, in control of, or in common control with, another entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 435, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 436, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.